Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1241
Department; duties; powers.

(1) The department shall use its best efforts to assure that any grant funds awarded to a nonprofit development organization are targeted to the geographic communities or regions with the most pressing housing, economic, and employment needs.

(2) The department shall use its best efforts to assure that the allocation of grant funds provides equitable access to the benefits provided by the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act to all eligible neighborhoods and communities.

(3) The director may contract with a statewide public or private nonprofit organization or a state instrumentality which shall serve as agent for the department to help carry out the purposes and requirements of the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act. The department or its agent may only use for expenses that portion of the funds available for the workforce housing investment grant program through the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund necessary to cover the actual costs of administering the program.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 20.
July 18, 2026